Utah statutes.
78A-6-107.   Expedited filing of petition -- Expedited hearings.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "petition" means a petition, under Section
78A-6-304, to commence proceedings in a juvenile court alleging that a child
is:
(a)  abused;
(b)  neglected; or
(c)  dependent.
(2)  If a petition is requested by the division, the attorney general shall
file the petition within 72 hours of the completion of the division's
investigation and request, excluding weekends and holidays, if:
(a)  the child who is the subject of the requested petition is not removed
from the child's home by the division; and
(b)  without an expedited hearing and services ordered under the protective
supervision of the court, the child will likely be taken into protective
custody.
(3)  The court shall give scheduling priority to the pretrial and adjudication
hearings on a petition if:
(a)  the child who is the subject of the petition is not in:
(i)  protective custody; or
(ii)  temporary custody; and
(b)  the division indicates in the petition that, without expedited hearings
and services ordered under the protective supervision of the court, the child
will likely be taken into protective custody.
